Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-12.5 Contested cases;
appeals.] [Section repealed July 1, 2019. L 2016, c 48, §14.]
(a) Chapter 91 shall apply to every contested case arising under this chapter
except where chapter 91 conflicts with this chapter, in which case this chapter
shall apply. Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, including chapter
91, any contested case under this chapter shall be appealed from a final
decision and order or a preliminary ruling that is of the nature defined by
section 91-14(a) upon the record directly to the supreme court for final
decision. Only a person aggrieved in a contested case proceeding provided for
in this chapter may appeal from the final decision and order or preliminary
ruling. For the purposes of this section, the term "person
aggrieved" includes an agency that is a party to a contested case
proceeding before that agency or another agency.

(b) The court shall give priority to contested
case appeals of significant statewide importance over all other civil or
administrative appeals or matters and shall decide these appeals as
expeditiously as possible. [L 2016, c 48, §1]

Note

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §12.

Cross References

Contested cases; see §174C-60.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next